Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201144-5511
Surplus lines
licensee; report; contents; when due.

On
or before February 15 for the quarter ending the preceding December 31, May
15 for the quarter ending the preceding March 31, August 15 for the quarter
ending the preceding June 30, and November 15 for the quarter ending the preceding
September 30 of each year, every surplus lines licensee shall
file with the department a report containing such information as the department
may require, including: (1) The name of the nonadmitted insurer; (2) the name
of the licensee; (3) the number of policies issued by each nonadmitted insurer;
(4) except for insurance placed
or procured on behalf of an exempt commercial purchaser, a sworn
statement by the licensee with regard to the coverages described in the quarterly
report that, to the best of the licensee's knowledge and belief, the licensee
could not reasonably procure such coverages from an admitted insurer; and
(5) the premium volume for each nonadmitted insurer by line of business.

Laws 1978, LB 836, § 9;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 36;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 44-147.03;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 11;

Laws 2011, LB70, § 8.
July 21, 2011